Arkansas, session 2025, SB562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-43-1004(e)(5), concerning the powers of
the Office of Internal Audit, is repealed.
(5)(A) Conduct an annual project review and efficiency study of
the Arkansas Department of Transportation, including without limitation a
review of processes, procedures, procurement, projects, appeals, and
expenditures.
(B) The results of the study under subdivision (e)(5)(A)
of this section shall be reported to the Legislative Council no later than
October 1 of each year with the first report to be submitted on or before
October 1, 2023; and


*ZRC099*
03/21/2025 8:24:42 AM ZRC099